New Jersey, session 221, A2039.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.186 (C.2C:24-7.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.  (1) A person commits a disorderly persons offense if he recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to another person. (2)   A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if he knowingly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of serious bodily injury to another person. (3)   A person commits a crime of the third degree if he knowingly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of death to another person. b.    (1) A person commits a crime of the fourth degree if he recklessly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to a person with a [developmental] disability or an elderly person. (2)   A person commits a crime of the third degree if he knowingly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of serious bodily injury to a person with a [developmental] disability or an elderly person. (3)   A person commits a crime of the second degree if he knowingly engages in conduct which creates a substantial risk of death to a person with a [developmental] disability or an elderly person. c.     As used in this act[, "developmental disability"]: disability has the meaning ascribed to it in subsection q. of section [3 of P.L.1977, c.82 (C.30:6D-3)] 5 of P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-5); and elderly person means a person who is 60 years of age or older. d.    Nothing in this act shall preclude an indictment and conviction for any other offense defined by the laws of this State. (cf: P.L.2015, c.186, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day following enactment.